Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.240

Certificates of permit, inspection, self-inspection.

(1) Certificates of permit, inspection certificates, and self-inspection certificates meeting the requirements of RCW 16.57.160 shall show the owner, number, breed, sex, brand, or other method of identification of the cattle or horses and any other necessary information required by the director.

(2) The director may issue certificate of permit forms to any person on payment of a fee established by rule.

(3) Certificates of permit, inspection certificates, self-inspection certificates meeting the requirements of RCW 16.57.160, or other satisfactory proof of ownership shall be kept by the owner and/or person in possession of any cattle and shall be furnished to the director or any peace officer upon demand.

(4) A self-inspection certificate meeting the requirements of RCW 16.57.160 is not valid if proof of ownership had not been provided by the seller to the buyer for cattle bearing brands not recorded to the seller.

[ 2010 c 66 s 8; 2003 c 326 s 27; 1995 c 374 s 51; 1991 c 110 s 4; 1985 c 415 s 8; 1981 c 296 s 18; 1959 c 54 s 24.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 374 ss 1-47, 50-53, and 59-68: See note following RCW 15.36.012.

Severability—1981 c 296: See note following RCW 15.08.010.